Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1193.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 29 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding parts to read:PART IPRELIMINARY PROVISIONS(Reserved)PART IIILAW ENFORCEMENTChapter31. Federal Immigration Enforcement in State FacilitiesCHAPTER 31FEDERAL IMMIGRATION ENFORCEMENT IN STATE FACILITIESSec.3101. Scope of chapter.123456789101112131415161718 3102. Definitions.3103. Civil immigration arrests.3104. Civil action.3105. Immunity not a defense.3106. Statute of limitations.§ 3101. Scope of chapter.This chapter relates to Federal immigration enforcement in State facilities.§ 3102. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Affected State entity." Any of the following:(1) An agency or department of the Commonwealth over which the Governor exercises executive authority.(2) A political subdivision.(3) A public benefit corporation, public authority, board or commission for which the Governor appoints the chairperson, chief executive officer or a majority of the members of the governing body."Judicial order." An order issued by a magistrate or judge acting within the judicial branch of Federal, State or local government."Judicial warrant." A warrant issued by a magistrate or judge acting within the judicial branch of Federal, State or local government."Political subdivision." As defined in 1 Pa.C.S. § 1991 (relating to definitions)."State facility." A building or structure, or portion thereof, owned, leased or otherwise occupied by an affected 20260SB1193PN1469 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 State entity.§ 3103. Civil immigration arrests.(a) Condition for executing.--A civil immigration arrest may not be executed within a State facility, a facility owned or leased by a local political subdivision or within 1,000 feet of a State facility or a facility owned or leased by a local political subdivision unless the arresting authority presents a valid judicial warrant or judicial order authorizing the arrest and detention of the individual named in the judicial warrant or judicial order.(b) Exception.--Subsection (a) shall not apply to a civil immigration arrest that is directly related to a judicial or administrative proceeding occurring within the State facility.§ 3104. Civil action.(a) Authorization of civil action.--An individual who is subjected to a civil immigration arrest in violation of this chapter, shall have a right of action against any affected State entity, or any officer, employee or agent of an affected State entity, that knowingly or recklessly permitted or facilitated the violation. In the action, the issue of whether the defendant engaged in the conduct alleged shall be determined according to the burden of proof used in other civil actions for relief similar to that sought.(b) Relief.--The plaintiff, in an action under subsection (a), may seek any of the following:(1) General and special damages, including damages for emotional distress. Damages under this paragraph shall be actual damages or $500, whichever is greater.(2) Punitive damages.(3) Reasonable attorney fees and costs.20260SB1193PN1469 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (4) Injunctive and other equitable relief.(5) Such other relief as the court deems necessary and proper.§ 3105. Immunity not a defense.The provisions of 42 Pa.C.S. Ch. 85 Subch. B (relating to actions against Commonwealth parties) or C (relating to actions against local parties) shall not bar an action for relief or damages under this chapter.§ 3106. Statute of limitations.An action under this chapter must be commenced within two years of the date of the alleged violation.Section 2. This act shall take effect immediately.20260SB1193PN1469 - 4 - 123456789101112